Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.361

Disciplinary action—Grounds.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a real estate broker, managing broker, designated broker, or real estate firm, regardless of whether the transaction was for the person's own account or in a capacity as broker, managing broker, designated broker, or real estate firm, and may impose any of the sanctions and fines specified in RCW 18.235.110 for any holder or applicant who is guilty of:

(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any lawful rules made by the director pursuant thereto or violating a provision of chapter 64.36, 19.105, or 18.235 RCW or RCW 18.86.030 or the rules adopted under those chapters or section;

(2) Making, printing, publishing, distributing, or causing, authorizing, or knowingly permitting the making, printing, publication or distribution of false statements, descriptions or promises of such character as to reasonably induce any person to act thereon, if the statements, descriptions, or promises purport to be made or to be performed by either the licensee or his or her principal and the licensee then knew or, by the exercise of reasonable care and inquiry, could have known, of the falsity of the statements, descriptions or promises;

(3) Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or device whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word, representation or conduct of the licensee;

(4) Accepting the services of, or continuing in a representative capacity, any broker or managing broker who has not been granted a license, or after his or her license has been revoked or during a suspension thereof;

(5) Conversion of any money, contract, deed, note, mortgage, or abstract or other evidence of title, to the person's own use or to the use of that person's principal or of any other person, when delivered in trust or on condition, in violation of the trust or before the happening of the condition; and failure to return any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, abstract, or other evidence of title within thirty days after the owner thereof is entitled thereto, and makes demand therefor, is prima facie evidence of such conversion;

(6) Failing, upon demand, to disclose any information within the person's knowledge, or to produce any document, book, or record in the person's possession for inspection by the director or the director's authorized representatives acting by authority of law;

(7) Continuing to sell any real estate, or operating according to a plan of selling, whereby the interests of the public are endangered, after the director has, by order in writing, stated objections thereto;

(8) Advertising in any manner without including the real estate firm's name or assumed name as licensed in a clear and conspicuous manner in the advertisement; except, that real estate brokers, managing brokers, or firms advertising their personally owned real property must only disclose that they hold a real estate license;

(9) Accepting other than cash or its equivalent as earnest money unless that fact is communicated to the owner before the owner's acceptance of the offer to purchase, and such fact is shown in the purchase and sale agreement;

(10) Charging or accepting compensation from more than one party in any one transaction without first making full disclosure in writing of all the facts to all the parties interested in the transaction;

(11) Accepting, taking, or charging any undisclosed commission, rebate, or direct profit on expenditures made for the principal;

(12) Accepting employment or compensation for appraisal of real property contingent upon reporting a predetermined value;

(13) Issuing a report on any real property in which the broker, managing broker, or real estate firm has an interest unless that interest is clearly stated in the report;

(14) Misrepresentation of membership in any state or national real estate association;

(15) Discrimination against any person in hiring or in real estate brokerage service activity, on the basis of any of the provisions of any local, county, state, or federal antidiscrimination law;

(16) Failing to keep an escrow or trustee account of funds deposited relating to a real estate transaction, for a period of three years, showing to whom paid, and other pertinent information as the director may require, such records to be available to the director, or the director's representatives, on demand, or upon written notice given to the bank;

(17) In the case of a firm and its designated broker, failing to preserve records relating to any real estate transaction for three years following the submission of the records to the firm;

(18) Failing to furnish a copy of any listing, sale, lease, or other contract relevant to a real estate transaction to all signatories thereof within a reasonable time following execution;

(19) In the case of a broker or managing broker, acceptance of a commission or any valuable consideration for the performance of any acts specified in this chapter, from any person, except the licensed real estate firm with whom the broker or managing broker is licensed;

(20) To direct any transaction involving his or her principal, to any lending institution for financing or to any escrow company, in expectation of receiving a kickback or rebate therefrom, without first disclosing the expectation to his or her principal;

(21) Buying, selling, or leasing directly, or through a third party, any interest in real property without disclosing in writing that the person is a real estate licensee;

(22) In the case of real estate firms, and managing and designated brokers, failing to exercise adequate supervision over the activities of their brokers and managing brokers within the scope of this chapter;

(23) Any conduct in a real estate transaction which demonstrates bad faith, dishonesty, untrustworthiness, or incompetence;

(24) Acting as a vehicle dealer, as defined in RCW 46.70.011, without having a license to do so; or

(25) Failing to ensure that the title is transferred under chapter 46.12 RCW when engaging in a transaction involving a mobile or manufactured home as a broker, managing or designated broker, or firm.

[ 2008 c 23 s 32; 2002 c 86 s 230; 1999 c 46 s 1; 1997 c 322 s 17; 1996 c 179 s 18; 1990 c 85 s 1; 1988 c 205 s 5. Prior: 1987 c 370 s 15; 1987 c 332 s 9; 1979 c 25 s 4; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 261 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 204 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 19; 1967 c 22 s 3; 1953 c 235 s 12; 1951 c 222 s 16; 1947 c 203 s 5; 1945 c 111 s 8; 1943 c 118 s 5; 1941 c 252 s 19; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-42; prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 13. Formerly RCW 18.85.230.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective date—1996 c 179: See RCW 18.86.902.

False advertising: Chapter 9.04 RCW.

Obstructing justice: Chapter 9A.72 RCW.